Washington statutes.
RCW 43.102.070

Investigators.

(1) The director shall designate investigator positions that are limited authority Washington peace officers as defined in RCW 10.93.020. The investigators designated as limited authority Washington peace officers have the authority to investigate any case within the jurisdiction of the office and any criminal activity related to, or discovered in the course of, the investigation of the case under the jurisdiction of the incident that has a relationship to the investigation.

(2) Any investigator employed or contracted with the office for the purpose of conducting investigations may participate in the investigations of a case under the jurisdiction of the office. Only investigators who are limited authority Washington peace officers may be designated a lead investigator on any criminal investigation conducted by the office pursuant to this chapter.

[ 2021 c 318 s 306.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2021 c 318: See note following RCW 43.102.020.